Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.17
Heir of adopted
person; access to information; when; fee.

(1)
Notwithstanding sections 43-119 to 43-146.16 and except as otherwise provided
in this section, an heir twenty-one years of age or older of an adopted person
shall have access to all information on file at the Department of Health and
Human Services related to such adopted person, including information contained
in the original birth certificate of the adopted person, if: (a)(i) The adopted
person is deceased, (ii) both biological parents of the adopted person are
deceased or, if only one biological parent is known, such parent is deceased,
and (iii) each spouse of the biological parent or parents of the adopted person,
if any, is deceased, if such spouse is not a biological parent; or (b) at
least one hundred years has passed since the birth of the adopted person.

(2) The following information relating to an adopted person
shall not be released to the heir of such person under this section: (a) Tests
conducted for the human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome; (b) the revocation of a license to practice medicine in the State
of Nebraska; (c) child protective services reports or records; (d) adult protective
services reports or records; (e) information from the central registry of
child protection cases and the Adult Protective Services Central Registry;
or (f) law enforcement investigative reports.

(3) The department shall provide a form that an heir of an
adopted person may use to request information under this section. The department
may charge a reasonable fee in an amount established by rules and regulations
of the department to recover expenses incurred by the department in carrying
out this section. Such fee may be waived if the requesting party shows that
the fee would work an undue financial hardship on the party. When any information
is provided to an heir of an adopted person under this section, the disclosure
of such information shall be recorded in the records of the adopted person,
including the nature of the information disclosed, to whom the information
was disclosed, and the date of the disclosure.

(4) For purposes of this section, an heir of an adopted person
means a direct biological descendent of such adopted person.

(5) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out this section.

Laws 2002, LB 952, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 61, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 106;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 20.